st.aff
FLAG long
SFX wN Y 41
SFX wN aire aire/ aire # po:infi
SFX wN aire aisant/ aire # po:ppre
SFX wN aire ais/ aire # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wN aire ait/ taire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wN aire aît/ plaire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wN aire ait/ plaire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wN aire aisons/ aire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wN aire aisez/ aire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wN aire aisent/ aire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wN aire aisais/ aire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wN aire aisait/ aire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wN aire aisions/ aire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wN aire aisiez/ aire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wN aire aisaient/ aire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wN aire us/ aire # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wN aire ut/ aire # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wN aire ûmes/ aire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wN aire ûtes/ aire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wN aire urent/ aire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wN aire airai/ aire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wN aire airas/ aire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wN aire aira/ aire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wN aire airons/ aire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wN aire airez/ aire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wN aire airont/ aire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wN aire airais/ aire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wN aire airait/ aire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX wN aire airions/ aire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX wN aire airiez/ aire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX wN aire airaient/ aire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX wN aire aise/ aire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wN aire aises/ aire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX wN aire usse/ aire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX wN aire usses/ aire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX wN aire ût/ aire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX wN aire ussions/ aire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX wN aire ussiez/ aire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX wN aire ussent/ aire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX wN aire ais/ aire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX wN aire aisons/ aire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX wN aire aisez/ aire # po:impe po:2pl

SFX wO Y 43
SFX wO aindre aindre/ aindre # po:infi
SFX wO aindre aignant/ aindre # po:ppre
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wO aindre aints/ aindre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wO aindre ainte/ aindre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wO aindre aintes/ aindre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignent/ aindre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignais/ aindre # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignait/ aindre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignions/ aindre # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aigniez/ aindre # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignaient/ aindre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignis/ aindre # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignit/ aindre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignîmes/ aindre # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignîtes/ aindre # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignirent/ aindre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrai/ aindre # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wO aindre aindras/ aindre # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindra/ aindre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrons/ aindre # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindrez/ aindre # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindront/ aindre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrais/ aindre # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindrait/ aindre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrions/ aindre # po:cond po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindriez/ aindre # po:cond po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindraient/ aindre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aigne/ aindre # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignes/ aindre # po:spre po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignisse/ aindre # po:simp po:1sg
SFX wO aindre aignisses/ aindre # po:simp po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignît/ aindre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignissions/ aindre # po:simp po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignissiez/ aindre # po:simp po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignissent/ aindre # po:simp po:3pl
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre # po:impe po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre # po:impe po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre # po:impe po:2pl

SFX wP Y 43
SFX wP aincre aincre/ vaincre # po:infi
SFX wP aincre ainquant/ vaincre # po:ppre
SFX wP aincre aincu/ vaincre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincus/ vaincre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincue/ vaincre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincues/ vaincre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/ vaincre # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainc/ vaincre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/ vaincre # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/ vaincre # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquent/ vaincre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquais/ vaincre # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquait/ vaincre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquions/ vaincre # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquiez/ vaincre # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquaient/ vaincre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquis/ vaincre # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquit/ vaincre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquîmes/ vaincre # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquîtes/ vaincre # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquirent/ vaincre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrai/ vaincre # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wP aincre aincras/ vaincre # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincra/ vaincre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrons/ vaincre # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincrez/ vaincre # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincront/ vaincre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrais/ vaincre # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincrait/ vaincre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrions/ vaincre # po:cond po:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincriez/ vaincre # po:cond po:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincraient/ vaincre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainque/ vaincre # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainques/ vaincre # po:spre po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisse/ vaincre # po:simp po:1sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisses/ vaincre # po:simp po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquît/ vaincre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquissions/ vaincre # po:simp po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissiez/ vaincre # po:simp po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissent/ vaincre # po:simp po:3pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/ vaincre # po:impe po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/ vaincre # po:impe po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/ vaincre # po:impe po:2pl
