st.dic
complaire/wNq.  # po:v3___nq__a
contraindre/wO  # po:v3__t_q__a
convaincre/wP  # po:v3_it_q__a
craindre/wO  # po:v3_it____a
déplaire/wNq.  # po:v3_i_nq__a
plaindre/wO  # po:v3_it_q__a
plaire/wNq.  # po:v3_i_nq__a
taire/wNq+  # po:v3__t_q__a
vaincre/wP  # po:v3_it_q__a
